Missouri, session 2026, HB1933.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 290, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 290.146, to read as follows:
290.146. It shall be an improper employment practice for an employer to
2 discharge, to refuse to hire, or to otherwise disadvantage any individual with respect to
3 compensation, terms, or conditions of employment based on the individual's credit score
4 or credit history unless such individual's credit score or credit history is directly,
5 materially, and substantially related to the duties and performance of the employee or
6 the overall operation of the employer's business.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.